Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.110

Reporting defects or omissions in the laws.

Court of appeals judges shall, on or before the first day of November in each year, report in writing to the justices of the supreme court, such defects and omissions in the laws as their experience may suggest.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 107 s 6.]